Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 1. Coastal Management Administration.

Sec. 46.39.010.
Coastal management duties; regulations. [Repealed, § 18 ch 31 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 46.39.020.
Alaska Coastal Policy Council. [Repealed, § 44 ch 24 SLA 2003.]

Secs. 46.39.030, 46.39.040.
Powers of the department; duties of the department. [Repealed, § 18 ch 31 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 46.39.050.
Council staff. [Repealed, § 44 ch 24 SLA 2003.]